Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2150.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1761.2 of Title 21, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. A person shall not establish an unauthorized camp upon a
street, sidewalk, or other public or private property within five
hundred (500) feet of public school or private school property.
B. Any person who violates the provisions of this section and
refuses to vacate the unauthorized camp upon command by a law
enforcement officer shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a
misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed Fifty Dollars
($50.00), or by imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed thirty
(30) days, or by both such fine and imprisonment.
Req. No. 12399 Page 1

C. As used in this section:
1. "Private school property" means a school that offers a
course of instruction for students in one or more grades from
prekindergarten through grade twelve and is not operated by a
governmental entity;
2. "Public school property" means any publicly owned property
held for purposes of elementary, secondary or vocational-technical
education, and shall not include property owned by public school
districts or where such property is leased or rented to an
individual or corporation and used for purposes other than
educational; and
3. "Unauthorized camp" means any tent, shelter, or bedding
constructed or arranged for the purpose of or in such a way to
permit overnight use on a property not designated as a campsite.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-12399 GRS 02/04/25







Req. No. 12399 Page 2